Utah statutes.
63G-2-303.    Private information concerning certain government employees.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "At-risk government employee" means a current or former:

(i)  peace officer as specified in Section 53-13-102;

(ii)  supreme court justice;

(iii)  judge of an appellate, district, or juvenile court;

(iv)  justice court judge;

(v)  judge authorized by Title 39, Chapter 6, Utah Code of Military Justice;

(vi)  federal judge;

(vii)  federal magistrate judge;

(viii)  judge authorized by Armed Forces, Title 10, United States Code;

(ix)  United States Attorney;

(x)  Assistant United States Attorney;

(xi)  a prosecutor appointed pursuant to Armed Forces, Title 10, United States Code;

(xii)  a law enforcement official as defined in Section 53-5-711; or

(xiii)  a prosecutor authorized by Title 39, Chapter 6, Utah Code of Military Justice.

(b)  "Family member" means the spouse, child, sibling, parent, or grandparent of an at-risk government employee who is living with the employee.

(2) (a)  Pursuant to Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(g), an at-risk government employee may file a written application that:

(i)  gives notice of the employee's status to each agency of a government entity holding a record or a part of a record that would disclose the employee's or the employee's family member's home address, home telephone number, Social Security number, insurance coverage, marital status, or payroll deductions; and

(ii)  requests that the government agency classify those records or parts of records private.

(b)  An at-risk government employee desiring to file an application under this section may request assistance from the government agency to identify the individual records containing the private information specified in Subsection (2)(a)(i).

(c)  Each government agency shall develop a form that:

(i)  requires the at-risk government employee to provide evidence of qualifying employment;

(ii)  requires the at-risk government employee to designate each specific record or part of a record containing the employee's home address, home telephone number, Social Security number, insurance coverage, marital status, or payroll deductions that the applicant desires to be classified as private; and

(iii)  affirmatively requests that the government entity holding those records classify them as private.

(3)  A county recorder, county treasurer, county auditor, or a county tax assessor may fully satisfy the requirements of this section by:

(a)  providing a method for the assessment roll and index and the tax roll and index that will block public access to the home address, home telephone number, situs address, and Social Security number; and

(b)  providing the at-risk government employee requesting the classification with a disclaimer informing the employee that the employee may not receive official announcements affecting the employee's property, including notices about proposed annexations, incorporations, or zoning modifications.

(4)  A government agency holding records of an at-risk government employee classified as private under this section may release the record or part of the record if:

(a)  the employee or former employee gives written consent;

(b)  a court orders release of the records; or

(c)  the government agency receives a certified death certificate for the employee or former employee.

(5) (a)  If the government agency holding the private record receives a subpoena for the records, the government agency shall attempt to notify the at-risk government employee or former employee by mailing a copy of the subpoena to the employee's last-known mailing address together with a request that the employee either:

(i)  authorize release of the record; or

(ii)  within 10 days of the date that the copy and request are mailed, deliver to the government agency holding the private record a copy of a motion to quash filed with the court who issued the subpoena.

(b)  The government agency shall comply with the subpoena if the government agency has:

(i)  received permission from the at-risk government employee or former employee to comply with the subpoena;

(ii)  has not received a copy of a motion to quash within 10 days of the date that the copy of the subpoena was mailed; or

(iii)  receives a court order requiring release of the records.

